Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1130
Posting of signs.

Signs shall be posted which provide notice that chemicals are applied in irrigation water in the field in areas being treated by means of chemigation with chemicals which appear on the restricted use list in the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act or chemicals for which labels require posting.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 30.